New York, session 2025-2026, A10230.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 1244 to read as follows: 3 § 1244. Registration of bicycles with electric assist. 1. Every bicy- 4 cle with electric assist as defined in section one hundred two-c of this 5 chapter shall be registered and issued a number plate by the department. 6 No person shall operate a bicycle with electric assist unless such bicy- 7 cle with electric assist shall have a distinctive number assigned to it 8 by the commissioner and a number plate issued by the commissioner with a 9 number corresponding to that of the certificate of registration. 10 2. Such number plates shall be of such material, form, design and 11 dimensions and contain or set forth such distinguishing number or other 12 identification marks as the commissioner shall prescribe, provided, 13 however, that there shall be at all times a marked contrast between the 14 color of the number plates and that of the numerals or letters thereon. 15 3. Each such number plate shall be conspicuously displayed on the rear 16 of the bicycle, securely fastened so as to prevent the same from swing- 17 ing. 18 4. The fee for such number plates shall be determined by the commis- 19 sioner. 20 5. Where there is a violation of this section, the fine for such 21 violation shall be determined by the commissioner. 22 § 2. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new section 23 1290 to read as follows: 24 § 1290. Registration of electric scooters. 1. Every electric scooter 25 as defined in section one hundred fourteen-e of this chapter shall be 26 registered and issued a number plate by the department. No person shall 27 operate an electric scooter unless such device shall have a distinctive EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14722-01-6 A. 10230 2 1 number assigned to it by the commissioner and a number plate issued by 2 the commissioner with a number corresponding to that of the certificate 3 of registration. 4 2. Such number plates shall be of such material, form, design and 5 dimensions and contain or set forth such distinguishing number or other 6 identification marks as the commissioner shall prescribe, provided, 7 however, that there shall be at all times a marked contrast between the 8 color of the number plates and that of the numerals or letters thereon. 9 3. Each such number plate shall be conspicuously displayed on the rear 10 of the electric scooter, securely fastened so as to prevent the same 11 from swinging. 12 4. The fee for such number plates shall be determined by the commis- 13 sioner. 14 5. Where there is a violation of this section, the fine for such 15 violation shall be determined by the commissioner. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.